District of Columbia statutes.
3-1251.13

Information booklet.

The Committee shall publish an informational booklet describing the Program for the public. The booklet shall be updated as may be necessary.

May 1, 2001, D.C. Law 13-297, § 14, 48 DCR 2036

History